Hawaii, session 2026, HB2296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's working families face significant economic challenges, including the rising cost of living, inflationary pressures, and limited affordable options for basic needs. Access to nutritious meals is essential for students' academic success and overall well-being.  However, the increasing cost of school meals may create challenges for many families and contribute to lower student participation in school meal programs. The legislature further finds that encouraging more students to participate in school meal programs is crucial for promoting equity, ensuring students have access to healthy food, and fostering an environment conducive to learning.  By reducing the financial burden on families, the State can help mitigate the impacts of economic hardship and support the health and academic achievement of Hawaii's keiki. The purpose of this Act is to reduce the minimum revenue requirement for the department of education from the sale of school meals from no less than one-half of the cost of preparing the meals to no more than one-quarter of the cost of preparing the meals, thereby making school meals more affordable for families and encouraging greater student participation in school meal programs. SECTION 2. Section 302A-405, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) The price for school meals shall be set by the department to ensure that moneys received from the sale of the meals shall be [not less] no more than [one-half] one-quarter of the cost of preparing the meals.  The prices for school meals may be adjusted annually based on the previous year's costs rounded to the nearest five cents; provided that the department by rule shall provide a lower rate or free meals to children based on their economic need." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.